California, session 20252026, AB2082.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Rural Farmworker Women’s Health Act of 2026.SEC. 2. Section 139 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:139. (a) For purposes of this section, “menstrual products” includes tampons, sanitary napkins, panty liners, and menstrual cups.(b) Beginning July 1, 2027, January 1, 2028, and upon appropriation by the Legislature for this purpose, the State Department of Public Health shall establish a program to work with local nonprofit organizations who have a history of serving farmworker communities to provide free menstrual products in rural or agricultural communities. The department shall prioritize the rural or agricultural communities with the highest rates of poverty.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading–Line 2___________________